Hawaii statutes.
§481C-6 Compliance with credit sale
contract law. If the contract referred to in section 481C-1 is a credit
sale contract, the seller must also comply with the requirements of chapter
476. [L 1976, c 32, pt of §5; am L 1985, c 68, §16]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next